Hawaii, session 2026, HB2361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 200D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (a) to read: "(a)  There is established within the department of land and natural resources, for administrative purposes only, the Kaneohe Bay regional council[; provided that except for the participation on the council of the two representatives from the department of land and natural resources as ex officio nonvoting members pursuant to subsection (c) and except as provided under section 26-35, the].  The department of land and natural resources shall [not] provide administrative support to the council, including providing staff, drafting, and other support at council meetings.  The council shall be composed of seven voting members appointed by the governor in accordance with section 26-34 and ex officio nonvoting members as provided in subsection (c).  The members shall serve without compensation." 2.  By amending subsection (e) to read: "(e)  The chairperson shall be [the administrator of the aquatic resources division.] selected by the voting members of the council from among all voting and nonvoting members on an annual and rotating basis." SECTION 2.  Section 200D-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§200D-4 [Annual meeting.] Council meetings.  The council shall schedule and conduct a meeting in accordance with chapter 92 [in each year of its operation.] quarterly." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________